Hawaii statutes.
[§503B-11] Rules. The
lieutenant governor may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as the lieutenant
governor deems necessary to implement this chapter, including but not limited
to the appointment and duties of commissioners of deeds and other measures necessary
to prevent the fraudulent use of a document affixed with the commissioner of
deeds' seal. [L 2016, c 78, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next